Utah statutes.
41-1a-104.   Commission powers.

The commission may:

(1)  enter into agreements with other jurisdictions:

(a)  relating to proportional registration to facilitate administration;

(b)  for the exchange of information for audit and enforcement activities; and

(c)  for cooperation with other jurisdictions;

(2)  confer and advise with the proper officers, officials, and legislative bodies of other jurisdictions to promote agreements under which the registration of vehicles owned in this state is recognized by the other jurisdictions;

(3)  make and enforce rules necessary to effectuate this chapter; and

(4)  adopt an official seal for the use of the division.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 1, 1992 General Session

